Illinois, session 104th, HB5711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The sum of $31,820,800, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 7Office of the State Comptroller, which includes in part, the 8approximate sum of $250,000 for the Comptroller's Office of 9Inspector General. 10    Section 10. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller 12from the Comptroller's Administrative Fund for the discharge 13of duties of the office. 14    Section 15. The sum of $50,300, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller from 16the State Lottery Fund for expenses in connection with the 17State Lottery. 18    Section 20. The sum of $111,371,200, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property 20Tax Replacement Fund to the State Comptroller for ordinary and   HB5711- 2 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1contingent expenses associated with the payment to official 2Court reporters pursuant to law. 3    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 4thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 5from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 6the elected State officers of the Executive Branch of the 7State Government, at various rates prescribed by law:8  For the Governor....................................245,6009  For the Lieutenant Governor.........................192,10010  For the Secretary of State..........................218,80011  For the Attorney General............................218,80012  For the Comptroller.................................192,10013  For the State Treasurer.............................192,10014    Total                                          $1,259,500 15    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 17the State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 18Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates 19prescribed by law:20From General Revenue Fund:21  Department on Aging22  For the Director..................................197,00023  Department of Central Management Services24  For the Director..................................232,800  HB5711- 3 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  For 2 Assistant Directors.........................395,7002  Department of Corrections3  For the Director..................................238,8004  For the Assistant Director........................203,0005  Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity6  For the Director..................................232,8007  For 2 Assistant Director..........................395,7008  Environmental Protection Agency9  For the Director..................................214,90010  For the Electric Vehicle Coordinator..............214,90011  Department of Early Childhood12   For the Secretary..................................232,80013   For 2 Assistant Directors..........................395,70014  Department of Human Services15  For the Secretary.................................238,80016  For 3 Assistant Secretaries.......................608,80017  Department of Juvenile Justice18  For the Director..................................197,00019  Department of Labor20  For the Director..................................214,90021  For the Assistant Director........................187,00022  For the Chief Factory Inspector....................67,00023  For the Superintendent of Safety Inspection24   and Education.....................................73,70025  Illinois State Police26  For the Director..................................238,800  HB5711- 4 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  For the Assistant Director........................166,9002  Department of Military Affairs3  For the Adjutant General..........................197,0004  For 2 Chief Assistants to the5   Adjutant General.................................334,8006  Department of Natural Resources7  For 6 Mine Officers...............................120,5008  Illinois Labor Relations Board9  For the Chairman..................................133,90010  For 4 State Labor Relations Board11   members..........................................482,00012  For 2 Local Labor Relations Board13   members..........................................241,00014  For the Local Labor Relations Board Chairman......120,50015  Department of Healthcare and Family Services16  For the Director..................................232,80017  For the Assistant Director........................197,90018  Department of Public Health19  For the Director..................................238,80020  For the Assistant Director........................203,00021  Department of Revenue22  For the Director..................................232,80023  For the Assistant Director........................197,90024  Property Tax Appeal Board25  For the Chairman...................................83,00026  For 4 members.....................................267,800  HB5711- 5 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  Department of Veterans' Affairs2  For the Director..................................238,8003  For the Assistant Director........................203,0004  Civil Service Commission5  For the Chairman...................................39,1006  For 4 members.....................................130,0007  Commerce Commission8  For the Chairman..................................172,0009  For 4 members.....................................600,60010  Court of Claims11  For the Chief Judge................................83,30012  For the 6 Judges..................................461,20013  Commission on Equity and Inclusion14  For the Chairman..................................160,40015  For 6 members.....................................915,90016  State Board of Elections17  For the Chairman...................................75,00018  For the Vice-Chairman..............................61,60019  For 6 members.....................................289,20020  Department of Human Rights21  For the Director..................................197,00022  Human Rights Commission23  For the Chairman..................................160,40024  For 6 members.....................................915,90025  Liquor Control Commission26  For the Chairman...................................50,000  HB5711- 6 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  For 6 members.....................................262,1002  For the Secretary..................................48,2003  For the Chairman and one member as designated4   by law, $200 per diem for work on a5   license appeal commission.........................55,0006  Executive Ethics Commission7  For 9 members.....................................433,8008  Pollution Control Board9  For the Chairman..................................155,30010  For 4 members.....................................600,60011  Prisoner Review Board12  For the Chairman..................................160,40013  For the Director of Victim and14   Witness Services.................................160,40015  For 14 members of the16  Prisoner Review Board.............................2,137,10017  Secretary of State Merit Commission18  For the Chairman........................................019  For 4 members......................................66,30020  Educational Labor Relations Board21  For the Chairman..................................133,90022  For 4 members.....................................482,00023  Illinois State Police24  For 7 members of the State Police Merit25   Board, $303 per diem, whichever is26   applicable in accordance with law, for a  HB5711- 7 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1   maximum of 100 days each.........................212,4002  Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board3  For 7 members.....................................337,4004  Office of Small Business Utility Advocate5  For the small business utility advocate.................06    Total                                         $18,229,000 7    Section 35. The following named sums, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 9General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay certain 10officers of the Legislative Branch of the State Government, at 11the various rates prescribed by law:12Office of Auditor General13  For the Auditor General.............................219,60014  For two Deputy Auditor Generals.....................316,00015    Total                                            $535,60016  For salaries of the members of the General Assembly, for 17   both the House of Representatives and the Senate; including18   base salary of $101,450 for each member of the General19   Assembly and additional amounts, as prescribed by law, for20   Speaker of the House, President of the Senate, Minority21   Leader of the House, Minority Leader of the Senate, Speaker22   Pro Tempore of the House, President Pro Tempore of the23   Senate, Majority Leaders in both chambers, 10 assistant24   majority and minority leaders in the Senate, 12 assistant25   majority and minority leaders, majority and minority caucus  HB5711- 8 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1   chairmen in the Senate, majority and minority conference2   chairmen in the House, 2 Deputy Majority and the 2 Deputy3   Minority leaders in the House, Majority Officer in the4   House, Majority Officer in the Senate, chairmen and5   minority spokesmen of standing committees in the Senate6   (except the Committee on Assignments), and chairmen and7   minority spokesmen of standing committees8   in the House....................................21,103,7009  For per diem allowances for the members of10   the Senate, as provided by law.....................700,00011  For per diem allowances for the members of12   the House, as provided by law....................1,200,00013  For mileage for all members of the General14   Assembly, as provided by law.......................700,00015    Total                                          $2,600,000 16    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 18State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 19Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates 20prescribed by law:21Department of Agriculture22  For the Director23  From Illinois State Fair Fund.....................214,90024  For the Assistant Director25  From Feed Control Fund............................187,000  HB5711- 9 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1Department of Children and Family Services2  For the Director3  From DCFS Children's Services Fund................238,8004Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 5Security6  For the Director7  From Nuclear Safety Emergency8  Preparedness Fund ................................214,9009  For the Assistant Director10  From Radiation Protection Fund....................187,00011Department of Financial and Professional Regulation12  From the Professions Indirect Cost Fund13  For the Secretary.................................232,80014  For the Director..................................214,90015  For the Director..................................214,90016Illinois Power Agency17  For the Director18   From the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund.....220,90019Department of Insurance20  From the Insurance Producer Administration Fund21  For the Director..................................214,90022  For the Assistant Director........................187,00023Department of Lottery24  For the Superintendent25   From State Lottery Fund............................214,90026Department of Natural Resources  HB5711- 10 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  Payable from Park and Conservation Fund2  For the Director..................................214,9003  For the Assistant Director........................187,0004Department of Transportation5  Payable from Road Fund6  For the Secretary.................................238,8007  For the Assistant Secretary.......................203,0008Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission9  Payable from Illinois Workers' Compensation10  Commission Operations Fund11  For the Chairman..................................195,90012  For nine members................................1,678,50013Office of the State Fire Marshal14  For the State Fire Marshal:15  From Fire Prevention Fund.........................197,00016Department of Gaming Regulation and Enforcement17  Payable from the State Gaming Fund18  For the Executive Director........................232,80019  For the Assistant Director........................197,90020  For eleven members of the Illinois21  Racing Board, $300 per diem to a22  maximum $16,067 as prescribed by law:23  From Horse Racing Fund............................176,80024Department of Employment Security25  Payable from Title III Social Security and26  Employment Fund:  HB5711- 11 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  For the Director..................................232,8002  For five members of the Board3   of Review.........................................75,0004Department of Innovation and Technology5  Payable from Technology Management6  Revolving Fund:7  For the Secretary.................................238,8008  For the Assistant Secretary.......................203,0009Department of Financial and Professional Regulation10  Payable from Real Estate License11  Administration Fund:12  For the Director..................................214,90013Department of Financial and Professional Regulation14  Payable from Bank and Trust Company Fund:15  For the Director..................................214,90016Subtotals:17  Feed Control Fund...................................187,00018  DCFS Children's Services Fund.......................238,80019  Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund..........214,90020  Radiation Protection Fund...........................187,00021  Professions Indirect Cost Fund......................662,60022  Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...............220,90023  Insurance Producer Administration Fund..............401,90024  State Lottery Fund..................................214,90025  Park and Conservation Fund..........................401,90026  Road Fund...........................................441,800  HB5711- 12 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  Illinois Workers' Compensation2  Commission Operations Fund........................1,874,4003  Illinois State Fair Fund............................214,9004  State Gaming Fund...................................430,7005  Fire Prevention Fund................................197,0006  Horse Racing Fund...................................374,7007  Bank and Trust Company Fund.........................214,9008  Title III Social Security and9   Employment Fund....................................307,80010  Technology Management Revolving Fund................441,80011  Real Estate License Administration Fund.............214,90012    Total                                          $7,442,800 13    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 15purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the State 16Comptroller in connection with the payment of salaries for 17officers of the Executive and Legislative Branches of State 18Government:19For State Contribution to State Employees' 20 Retirement System:21  From Horse Racing Fund...............................91,00022  From Fire Prevention Fund............................90,50023  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................98,70024  From Title III Social Security25   and Employment Fund................................141,400  HB5711- 13 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  From Feed Control Fund...............................85,9002  From DCFS Children's Services Fund..................109,7003  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......98,7004  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................85,9005  From Illinois State Fair Fund........................98,7006  From State Gaming Fund..............................197,9007  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund.................304,3008  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund..........101,5009  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund.........184,60010  From State Lottery Fund..............................98,70011  From Park and Conservation Fund.....................184,60012  From Road Fund......................................202,90013  From Illinois Workers' Compensation14   Commission Operations Fund.........................861,00015  From Technology Management Revolving Fund...........202,90016  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........98,70017    Total                                          $3,337,60018For State Contribution to Social Security:19  From General Revenue Fund.........................1,755,40020  From Horse Racing Fund...............................27,90021  From Fire Prevention Fund............................14,30022  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................14,60023  From Title III Social Security24   and Employment Fund.................................20,60025  From Feed Control Fund...............................14,30026  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................15,000  HB5711- 14 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......14,6002  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................14,3003  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund..................44,0004  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........14,7005  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........28,9006  From State Lottery Fund..............................14,6007  From Illinois State Fair Fund........................14,6008  From State Gaming Fund...............................29,2009  From Park and Conservation Fund......................28,90010  From Road Fund.......................................29,30011  From Illinois Workers' Compensation12   Commission Operations Fund.........................142,70013  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............29,30014  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........14,60015    Total                                          $2,281,80016For Group Insurance:17  From Fire Prevention Fund............................35,20018  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................35,20019  From Title III Social Security and20   Employment Fund.....................................35,20021  From Feed Control Fund...............................35,20022  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................35,20023  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......35,20024  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................35,20025  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund.................105,60026  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........35,200  HB5711- 15 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........70,4002  From State Lottery Fund..............................35,2003  From Park and Conservation Fund......................70,4004  From Road Fund.......................................70,4005  From Illinois Workers' Compensation6   Commission Operations Fund.........................352,0007  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............70,4008  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........35,2009  From Illinois State Fair Fund........................35,20010  From State Gaming Fund...............................70,40011  From Horse Racing Fund...............................35,20012    Total                                          $1,232,000 13    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 15from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 16certain appointed officers of the Executive Branch of the 17State Government, at the various rates prescribed by law:18Executive Inspector Generals19  For the Executive Inspector General for the20   Office of the Governor.............................221,70021  For the Executive Inspector General for the22   Office of the Attorney General.....................176,20023  For the Executive Inspector General for the24   Office of the Secretary of State...................176,20025  For the Executive Inspector General for the  HB5711- 16 -LRB104 20993 BDA 34868 b1   Office of the Comptroller..........................153,5002  For the Executive Inspector General for the3   Office of the Treasurer............................153,5004    Total                                            $881,100 5    Section 55. The amount of $2,015,400, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the State Comptroller for contingencies in the event 8that any amounts appropriated in Sections 5 through 60 of this 9Article are insufficient. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.